Missouri, session 2026, HB2011.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
PART 1
Section 11.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item
or items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part
1. Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 2
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. Part 3 of
this act shall consist of guidance to the Department of Social
Services in implementing the appropriations found in Part 1 and
Part 2 of this act. An appropriation may be comprised in whole
or in part of a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall
be construed to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the
stated appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation
identified as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an
addition to any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal
periods beyond June 30, 2027. Any amount identified as one-time
may, however, be requested in any future fiscal period as a new
decision item.
Section 11.005. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Director's Office, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service ................................................................................................$182,958
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,770
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................210,728
Personal Service ..................................................................................................164,486
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,197
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................165,683
Personal Service
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 44,008
Total (Not to exceed 2.93 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$420,419
Section 11.007. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Technology Unit
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$54,080

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 3
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 162,239
Total (Not to exceed 2.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$216,319
Section 11.010. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General Assembly
provided that the General Assembly shall be notified of the
source of any new funds and the purpose for which they shall be
expended, in writing, prior to the use of said funds
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$2,000,000
From Family Services Donations Fund (1167) .................................................... 33,999
Total ...........................................................................................................................$2,033,999
Section 11.015. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the OA
Information Technology Federal Fund
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$3,687,812
Section 11.020. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For implementation on the citizen engagement platform of a Medicaid
application providing transparency and two-way communication
for efficient application processing and data collection as well as
additional functionality necessary to improve efficiency in
processing applications for assistance, provided the department
shall procure services in compliance with Chapter 34, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$400,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 3,600,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,000,000
Section 11.025. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Human Resources Center, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service ................................................................................................$396,374
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,919
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................406,293

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 4
Personal Service ..................................................................................................215,737
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 28,596
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................244,333
Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 28,577
Total (Not to exceed 10.50 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................$679,203
Section 11.030. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the State Technical Assistance Team (STAT)
For the prevention and investigation of child abuse, child neglect, child
sexual abuse, child exploitation/pornography or child fatality
cases, as described in Sections 660.520 to 660.528, RSMo, and
for administrative expenses, provided five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment; and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,737,248
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 223,786
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,961,034
For the Critical Event Program Staff
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 334,412
Total (Not to exceed 33.50 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,295,446
Section 11.035. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit, provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and further provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,991,058
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 404,161
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,395,219
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,469,670

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 5
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 900,493
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................3,370,163
Expense and Equipment
From Recovery Audit and Compliance Fund (1974) .......................................................82,087
Personal Service ..................................................................................................342,361
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 141,946
From Medicaid Provider Enrollment Fund (1990) .........................................................484,307
For the purposes of expanding efforts to eliminate fraud, waste, and
abuse within benefit programs, including MO HealthNet, through
proactive measures utilizing data analytics, as well as in response
to strategies identified through national efforts to enhance
program integrity
Personal Service ..................................................................................................148,963
Expense and Equipment (including $25,957 one-time) ........................... 51,312
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................200,275
Personal Service ..................................................................................................117,041
Expense and Equipment (including $20,395 one-time) ........................... 40,318
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 157,359
Total (Not to exceed 94.05 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,689,410
Section 11.040. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit
For a case management, provider enrollment, and fraud abuse and
detection system, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,141,709
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 5,858,291
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,000,000
Section 11.045. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit
For the design, development, implementation, maintenance, and
operation costs for a Medicaid provider enrollment system

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 6
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,271,026
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 12,639,235
Total .........................................................................................................................$17,910,261
Section 11.050. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Medicaid Audit and Compliance Unit
For recovery audit services
Expense and Equipment
From Recovery Audit and Compliance Fund (1974) ................................................$1,200,000
Section 11.052. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director
For the Department of Social Services Systems Information Technology
Operations and Procurement, for the purpose of providing
technology and procurement operations and support for program-
specific applications, business function security, project
management, and agency-level Information Technology
procurements for the purpose of providing efficiency and
maintaining compliance with state and federal standards across
the Social Services programs, provided fifty percent (50%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,230,714
Expense and Equipment (including $40,365 one-time) ........................... 12,975,245
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................19,205,959
Personal Service ...............................................................................................7,319,262
Expense and Equipment (including $54,027 one-time) ........................... 27,168,327
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................34,487,589
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,357,176
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,373,546
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 8,730,722
Total (Not to exceed 185.24 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$62,424,270
Section 11.053. To the Department of Social Services
For the Office of the Director

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 7
In accordance with Executive Orders 26-02 and 26-03, funds are
provided to the Division of Information Technology to establish
a shared artificial intelligence (AI) development environment,
including necessary tooling, platforms, and dedicated personnel.
This infrastructure shall serve as a foundational capability
available to state agencies for the responsible and secure
integration of AI into government operations. Funding shall
support workforce productivity tools and modernization efforts
that reduce manual processes and improve the delivery of
services to Missouri citizens
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 11.055. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,642,270
Expense and Equipment (including $17,289 one-time) ........................... 381,091
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,023,361
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,604,146
Expense and Equipment (including $23,148 one-time) ........................... 307,464
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,911,610
Personal Service ......................................................................................................5,246
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 317
From Department of Social Services Administrative Trust Fund (1545) ...........................5,563
Personal Service ....................................................................................................65,736
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 750
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................................66,486
For the centralized inventory system, for reimbursable goods and
services provided by the department, and for related equipment
replacement and maintenance expenses
From Department of Social Services Administrative Trust Fund (1545) ............ 1,200,000
Total (Not to exceed 58.52 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,207,020
Section 11.060. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 8
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the Child Welfare Eligibility Unit
For administrative expenses, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service ................................................................................................$881,572
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 21,300
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................902,872
Personal Service ..................................................................................................779,815
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 18,964
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 798,779
Total (Not to exceed 35.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,701,651
Section 11.065. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the Compliance Services Unit
For administrative expenses
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$218,288
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146) ..........................................................178,134
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................255,985
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................130,919
For contracted compliance monitoring and fiscal monitoring services
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,031,110
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 578,663
Total (Not to exceed 11.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,393,099
Section 11.070. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the payment of fees to contractors who engage in revenue
maximization projects on behalf of the Department of Social
Services and the General Assembly
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..........................................$450,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 150,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$600,000
Section 11.075. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 9
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For the receipt and disbursement of refunds and incorrectly deposited
receipts to allow the over-collection of accounts receivables to be
paid back to the recipient, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility
is allowed between federal and other funds within this section
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) .............................................$450,000
From FMAP Enhancement-Expansion Fund (2466) ......................................................450,000
From Federal and Other Fund (1189) ..........................................................................1,500,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................5,025,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ...........................27,000
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................................10,250,000
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ......................................................369,000
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146) ..........................................................500,000
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...............................................................................................................1,500,000
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114) ..............................................................................25,000
From Premium Fund (1885) ........................................................................................5,500,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus Fund (2355) .............................750,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Stimulus – 2021 Fund
(2456) ....................................................................................................... 200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$26,546,000
Section 11.080. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Finance and Administrative Services
For payments to counties and the City of St. Louis for the care and
maintenance of each delinquent or dependent child as provided
in Section 211.156, RSMo, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,324,062
Section 11.085. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Legal Services administrative expenses, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 11.910
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,527,170
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 146,300
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,673,470

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 10
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,100,033
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 141,064
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,241,097
Personal Service ..................................................................................................749,526
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 230,773
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................980,299
Personal Service ..................................................................................................719,349
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 91,158
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ......................................................810,507
Personal Service
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 178,880
Total (Not to exceed 115.04 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$7,884,253
Section 11.090. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Legal Services
For permanency attorneys and permanency attorney contracted services,
including reunification, guardianship, adoption, or termination of
parental rights, for children in the care, custody, or involved with
the Children’s Division, provided twenty five percent (25%)
flexibility is allowed from expense and equipment to personal
service, and further provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is
allowed from personal service to expense and equipment, and
further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.455, 11.460, 11.485,
11.495, and 11.500
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,349,951
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,386,211
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,736,162
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,052,820
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 915,506
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,968,326
Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................252,379
Personal Service

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 11
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ........................................................67,045
Personal Service
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................................14,061
For Title IV-E reimbursements to counties, the City of St. Louis, and
other organizations who receive public dollars for the legal
representation of parents and children in juvenile or family courts
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................600,000
For non-recurring adoption or legal guardianship expenses related to
permanency, including but not limited to: reasonable and
necessary adoption fees, court costs, attorney fees and other
expenses which are directly related to the legal adoption or legal
guardianship
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,019,345
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................826,778
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................208,177
For a program to provide legal representation for parents of children who
are the subject of child abuse and neglect investigations under
Chapter 210 and potential court proceedings under Chapter 211
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 150,000
Total (Not to exceed 80.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$12,842,273
Section 11.095. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Legal Services
For a not-for-profit organization to provide legal assistance for kinship
placements with non-contested guardianship cases in a county
with more than seven hundred thousand but fewer than eight
hundred thousand inhabitants, and a county with more than two
hundred thirty thousand but fewer than two hundred sixty
thousand inhabitants, and a county with more than one hundred
thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty thousand inhabitants
and with a county seat with more than four thousand but fewer
than six thousand inhabitants, and a county with more than one
hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred twenty thousand
inhabitants, and with a county seat with more than nine thousand
but fewer than eleven thousand inhabitants, and in a county with

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 12
more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than twenty-five
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than nine
thousand but fewer than twelve thousand five hundred
inhabitants, and in a county with more than one hundred fifty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants, and
in a county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than ten
thousand but fewer than fourteen thousand inhabitants, and in a
county with more than seventy thousand but fewer than eighty
thousand inhabitants, and in a county with more than fourteen
thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three thousand
but fewer than four thousand five hundred fifty inhabitants, to
help children remain safely with kinship caregivers and prevent
the need for foster care placement
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$200,000
Section 11.096. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Legal Services
For a 501(c)(3) non-profit organization, founded in 1989 and located in
a city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than
two hundred thousand inhabitants, whose mission is to recruit,
train and support community volunteers who assist the court in
protecting the best interests of abused and neglected children in
Southwest Missouri, for the purpose of program expansion and
services into surrounding counties
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (one-time) ........................$200,000
Section 11.100. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,697,796
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 70,690
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,768,486
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,361,874
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,511,919
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................8,873,793

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 13
Personal Service ....................................................................................................51,137
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 501,513
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................552,650
Personal Service
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 657,029
Total (Not to exceed 109.80 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$12,851,958
Section 11.104. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the income maintenance Quality Assurance Team
Personal Service ................................................................................................$266,614
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,916
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................271,530
Personal Service ..................................................................................................799,841
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 14,749
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 814,590
Total (Not to exceed 23.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,086,120
Section 11.105. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the income maintenance field staff and operations, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$36,426,688
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,700,582
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................44,127,270
Personal Service .............................................................................................34,614,212
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 14,039,027
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................48,653,239
Personal Service ..................................................................................................434,233
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 95,138
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................529,371
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,037,345
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,924
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 1,065,269
Total (Not to exceed 1,556.23 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$94,375,149

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 14
Section 11.106. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Medical Review Team (MRT)
For administrative expenses
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$226,254
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 678,763
Total (Not to exceed 21.00 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................$905,017
Section 11.107. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For contracted services to support Medicaid eligibility renewal
processing and the development of training materials to support
ongoing operations
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,310,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 6,930,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,240,000
Section 11.110. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Income Maintenance (IM) Call Center
For state operated and contracted call center administrative and
operational expenses, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between subsections within this section
For Medicaid and Children’s Health Insurance Program (CHIP)
eligibility
Personal Service ................................................................................................$920,389
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,544,470
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,464,859
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,768,127
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,632,904
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................7,401,031
For Adult Expansion Group (AEG) eligibility, as described in Section
36(c) of Article IV of the Missouri Constitution
Personal Service ..................................................................................................315,567

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 15
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 540,473
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................856,040
Personal Service ..................................................................................................965,469
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,621,418
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,586,887
For Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) eligibility
Personal Service ...............................................................................................7,399,089
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,258,611
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................12,657,700
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,866,640
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,505,605
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................7,372,245
For Temporary Assistance eligibility
Personal Service ..................................................................................................552,291
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 245,951
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 798,242
Total (Not to exceed 438.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$34,137,004
Section 11.115. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For public acute care hospital partnerships to assist with eligibility
determinations for Medicaid and CHIP
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................$ 312,500
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 937,500
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,250,000
Section 11.120. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For income maintenance and child support staff training, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$118,118
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 97,674
Total ..............................................................................................................................$215,792

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 16
Section 11.125. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit organization established in 2018 to provide benefits and
services as provided by the Refugee Act of 1980 as amended;
whose mission and vision is promoting the well-being and
inclusion of refugees by resourcing and coordinating resettlement
programs across the state; and subcontracts or partners with local
refugee resettlement programs throughout the state to ensure
access to resources needed to help populations serviced rebuild
their lives
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$37,904,538
Section 11.130. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Electronic Benefit Transfers (EBT) system
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,086,957
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................482,970
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 100,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,669,927
Section 11.135. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) program
For administrative expenses
Personal Service ................................................................................................$171,367
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,543
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................182,910
Personal Service ..................................................................................................171,367
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 11,543
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 182,910
Total (Not to exceed 6.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$365,820
Section 11.140. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) program
For contracted vendor costs and outreach costs
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 17
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,987,620
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 4,987,620
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,975,240
Section 11.141. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (one-time) .....................$1,357,677
Section 11.145. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Missouri SuN Bucks Summer Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT)
program benefit disbursements
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$51,500,000
Section 11.150. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the receipt of funds from the Polk County and Bolivar Charitable
Trust for the exclusive benefit and use of the Polk County Office
From Family Services Donations Fund (1167) ...............................................................$10,000
Section 11.155. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For contractor, hardware, and other costs associated with planning,
development, and implementation of a Family Assistance
Management Information System (FAMIS), provided, three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$571,908
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..............................................73,422
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 400,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,045,330
Section 11.160. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For Missouri Eligibility Determination and Enrollment System
(MEDES), provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 11.160 and 11.165, and further provided three

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 18
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
For the design, development, implementation, maintenance and
operation costs of the Medicaid and Children’s Health Insurance
Program (CHIP) eligibility categories under the Modified
Adjusted Gross Income (MAGI) based methodology
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative
costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,179,105
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................25,179,260
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,300,007
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................1,000,004
For the design, development, and implementation costs for Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP)
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative
costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,093,538
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................7,652,690
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................2,000,000
For the design, development, and implementation costs for Temporary
Assistance (TA)
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative
costs
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................200,000
For the expenses for the independent verification and validation (IV&V)
services
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative
costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................352,983
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................970,537
For the expenses related to the enterprise content management (ECM)
system
Expense and Equipment, excluding employee administrative
costs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................453,867

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 19
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,227,500
For the expenses related to the project management office (PMO)
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,359,631
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 2,661,566
Total .........................................................................................................................$53,630,688
Section 11.165. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For third party eligibility verification services: in order to improve the
accuracy of Medicaid, SNAP and TANF eligibility
determinations and redeterminations, increase operational
efficiencies, achieve cost savings, and minimize fraud, the
Missouri Department of Social Services shall obtain real-time
employment and income data (up-to-date, non-modeled
employment and income data provided by employers and/or
payroll providers) from a payroll data provider, as defined by the
Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. s.1681 et seq., provided the
term "payroll data provider" means payroll providers, wage
verification companies, and other commercial or non-
commercial entities that collect and maintain data regarding
employment and wages; and further provided the contractors
shall also, on a monthly basis, identify participants of covered
programs who have died, moved out of state, or been incarcerated
longer than 90 days, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 11.160 and 11.165
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,336,379
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................9,462,396
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 217,878
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,016,653
Section 11.170. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For income maintenance eligibility system updates and additional
resources to implement Public Law No. 119-21
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$17,246,497
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 32,346,763

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 20
Total .........................................................................................................................$49,593,260
Section 11.175. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Food Nutrition Program
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$7,031,849
Section 11.180. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a public school located in a city with more than one thousand nine
hundred but fewer than two thousand one hundred fifty
inhabitants and located in a county with more than twenty-two
thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than five hundred but fewer than
nine hundred, a public school located in a city with more than
twelve thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than fifty thousand
but fewer than sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat
with more than twelve thousand six hundred but fewer than
fifteen thousand inhabitants, a public school located in a city with
more than seven thousand but fewer than eight thousand
inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county with more than
fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than seventeen
thousand six hundred inhabitants, a public school located in a city
with more than four thousand nine hundred but fewer than five
thousand six hundred inhabitants and that is the county seat of a
county with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer
than fourteen thousand inhabitants, and a public school located in
a city with more than twelve thousand five hundred but fewer
than fourteen thousand inhabitants and located in a county with
more than fifty thousand but fewer than sixty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than ten thousand
but fewer than twelve thousand six hundred inhabitants, for a
model that uses integrated student support in collaboration with
local communities to address barriers to student success
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................$1,000,000
For a nonprofit organization located in a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 21
county that provides programs and services including math,
science, and computer tutoring; job skills training; transportation;
food and clothing programs; and sports programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For Missouri Work Programs
For a century-old viable non-profit entity located in a city not within a
county that annually serves over one hundred thousand clients
regionally assisting participants to become successful employees
and that serves economically disadvantaged males and females to
find jobs and have the opportunity to earn livable wages
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,000,000
For a program in a city with more than four hundred thousand inhabitants
and located in more than one county to teach parenting
curriculum and other skills to men, along with assisting them in
finding employment, health care, dealing with civil and criminal
charges and cases and other social services thus allowing them to
develop healthy and supportive relationships with their kids and
families
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..............................................................................................................50,000
For the purpose of funding a program in a city not within a county to
foster healthy relationships by strengthening families and
reducing the rates of absentee fathers through employment
placement, job readiness, and employer retention skills
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 1,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,350,000
Section 11.181. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city not within a county that
has been in operation for over 100 years and provides children
and family services
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................$1,000,000
Section 11.185. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 22
For a nonprofit organization located in a city with more than four
hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county that provides job training in pet grooming to help break
generational poverty, including the expansion of such services to
additional locations
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$995,354
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 600,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,595,354
Section 11.187. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a program in any county with more than seventy thousand but fewer
than eighty thousand inhabitants that is a national service
initiative and is the most successful mentoring program for young
people of color from its inception, was to provide scholarships to
needy and talented students from grades 6–12, and to inform
young people of the professions and other career options
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................$25,000
Section 11.190. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization located in any county with more than one
million inhabitants that provides youth and their family with
mentorship as well as virtual or in-person educational
opportunities relating to college preparedness, workforce
development, and character preparation to foster academic
success
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................$1,080,500
Section 11.191. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit organization located in a county with more than one
million inhabitants that is driven by the goal to make the world a
better place for all youth, strives to build productive relationships
and make a positive impact in all pursuits
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$100,000
Section 11.195. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 23
For the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) benefits and
Temporary Assistance (TA) Diversion transitional benefits
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,946,121
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................11,718,245
For the purpose of funding a joint effort between a program in any city
not within a county that builds strong families and vibrant
communities by providing hope, comprehensive services, and
meaningful opportunities that exemplifies the cultural and artistic
traditions of people in Africa, the Caribbean and the Americas
and a century-old viable non-profit entity located in a city not
within a county that annually serves over one hundred thousand
clients regionally assisting participants to become successful
employees and that serves economically disadvantaged males
and females to find jobs and have the opportunity to earn livable
wages
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................250,000
For a nonprofit organization headquartered in a city with more than one
hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants whose mission is to feed the world through children's
feeding initiatives, community outreaches, disaster response, and
strategic program partners
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 750,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,664,366
Section 11.200. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a healthy marriage and fatherhood initiative
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................$1,250,000
Section 11.201. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit organization, founded in 1977 and located in a city with
more than eight thousand but fewer than nine thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than one million
inhabitants, whose mission is to empower children, parents and
families during and after divorce through counseling, education,
and support to ensure successful outcomes, improve emotional

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 24
and family stability, and promote opportunities to achieve goals
and transition into healthy and productive adults
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$100,000
Section 11.205. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For supplemental payments to aged or disabled persons
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................$6,120
Section 11.210. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For nursing care payments to aged, blind, or disabled persons, and for
personal funds to recipients of Supplemental Nursing Care
payments as required by Section 208.030, RSMo, provided
thirty-five percent (35%) flexibility is allowed from Section
11.210 to 11.745
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$22,344,440
Section 11.215. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For Blind Pension and supplemental payments to blind persons, provided
that the Department of Social Services, whenever it calculates a
new estimated rate or rates for the Blind Pension and/or
supplemental payments to blind persons for the upcoming fiscal
year, shall transmit the new estimated rate or rates, as well as the
accompanying assumptions and calculations used to create the
new estimated rate or rates, to the following organizations:
Missouri Council for the Blind, National Federation of the Blind
of Missouri, and the State Rehabilitation Council
From Blind Pension Fund (1621) ............................................................................$38,838,112
Section 11.220. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the administration of blind services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,093,800
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 114,927
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,208,727

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 25
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,113,351
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 754,915
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 4,868,266
Total (Not to exceed 102.69 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$6,076,993
Section 11.225. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For services for the visually impaired, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,298,211
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................5,657,946
From Family Services Donations Fund (1167) .................................................................99,995
From Blindness Education, Screening and Treatment Program Fund
(1892) ....................................................................................................... 349,325
Total ...........................................................................................................................$7,405,477
Section 11.230. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For business enterprise programs for the blind
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$44,603,034
Section 11.232. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a professional women's soccer team located in a city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county to provide youth soccer clubs and programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................$20,000
Section 11.235. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Child Support Enforcement field staff and operations, provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 11.910
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,681,668
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,587,989
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,269,657
Personal Service .............................................................................................19,803,965

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 26
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,684,247
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................25,488,212
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,457,642
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,146,390
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 4,604,032
Total (Not to exceed 584.04 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$36,361,901
Section 11.236. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit organization which was founded in 2008 and located
in any city with more than one hundred twenty-five thousand but
fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants provided the
funds are used for responsible fatherhood services and healthy
marriage activities, including but not limited to the collection of
child support checks, and provided the Department of Social
Services shall apply for any waivers necessary to allow the non-
profit organization to expend these funds
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ............................................................$500,000
Section 11.240. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Child Support Enforcement Call Center
For state operated call center administrative and operational expenses
Personal Service ................................................................................................$887,742
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 614,885
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,502,627
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,694,015
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,297,503
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,991,518
Personal Service ..................................................................................................129,519
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 95,844
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 225,363
Total (Not to exceed 67.20 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,719,508
Section 11.245. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Family Support Payment Center

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 27
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$72,799
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,470,006
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................3,542,805
Personal Service ....................................................................................................35,931
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,462,900
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 1,498,831
Total (Not to exceed 2.62 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$5,041,636
Section 11.250. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For reimbursements to counties and the City of St. Louis and contractual
agreements with local governments providing child support
services, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,840,491
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................13,386,582
From Child Support Enforcement Fund (1169) ................................................... 800,212
Total .........................................................................................................................$16,027,285
Section 11.252. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a 501(c)(3) non-profit corporation formed in 2010, and located in a
city with more than one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than
two hundred thousand inhabitants to assist at-risk or foster care
youth ranging in ages from 16 to 24 years old through its positive
youth development programs and by helping them identify and
apply their unique strengths in order to experience a successful,
self-sufficient transition into adulthood
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$150,000
Section 11.253. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a 501 (c)(3) organization incorporated in 1971 located in a city with
more than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more
than one county that offers residential support to men over 21
years old as they work to rebuild their lives from alcohol and drug
use
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$500,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 28
Section 11.255. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For reimbursements to the federal government for federal Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families payments, refunds of bonds,
refunds of support payments or overpayments, and distributions
to families
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$29,000,000
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) .......................................................................6,000,000
For the purpose of funding a program located in a city not within a county
that assists individuals with limited opportunities to self-
sufficiency by breaking down barriers to self-sufficiency,
assisting survivors of domestic violence while fostering healthy
co-parenting relationships, reducing the rates of absentee fathers,
child development and strengthening families, all while creating
a safer and more inclusive community
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ................................................................................................. 250,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$35,250,000
Section 11.259. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization located in any county with more than four
hundred thousand but fewer than five hundred thousand
inhabitants whose mission is to provide school districts' student
personnel with suicide prevention skills and awareness, training
on social media harassment and bullying interventions, and
mental health therapy resources
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$200,000
Section 11.260. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Department of Social Services Federal Fund
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ........................................................................$955,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 29
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Child
Support Enforcement Fund
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 245,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,200,000
Section 11.265. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Office of Workforce and Community Initiatives
For administrative expenses
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$176,390
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,927,955
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 1,068,061
Total (Not to exceed 48.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,172,406
Section 11.266. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city not within a county
dedicated to educating, strengthening, and empowering women
and children affected by domestic violence
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$500,000
Section 11.267. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a 501(c)(3) non-profit corporation with more than 30 employees,
formed in 1969, and located in a city with more than one hundred
sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants
for training, resources, and support to equip volunteers to tutor
and support student learning in public elementary schools
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$150,000
Section 11.268. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a non-profit organization located in any county with more than one
million inhabitants that assists abused and neglected women and
teens with support resources and community education to help

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 30
them out of abusive environments and promote a positive and
productive future
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$200,000
Section 11.270. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For grants and contracts to Community Partnerships and other
community initiatives and related expenses, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,132,328
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..............................................78,307
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................7,025,492
For the Missouri Mentoring Partnership
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................935,000
For a program for adolescents with the goal of preventing teen
pregnancies
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 400,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$9,571,127
Section 11.271. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit located in a county with more than one million
inhabitants which focuses on at risk and under-represented youth
and young adults provided the funding is used for personal and
professional skills development, peer-mentoring services, and
training young adults to become mentor leaders
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................$70,000
Section 11.275. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Missouri Work Assistance Program Unit
For Work Assistance Programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,855,554
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................12,017,755
For the Missouri SkillUp Program

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 31
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................4,672,471
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................5,469,104
For the attendance of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
recipients at adult high schools as designated by the Department
of Elementary and Secondary Education
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................5,100,000
For the attendance of low-income individuals at adult high schools as
designated by the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,000,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................6,400,000
For child care at adult high school locations
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,510,000
For Jobs for America’s Graduates
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................4,500,000
For a comprehensive counseling and solution generation service that
focuses on a multi-year journey for high school students from
initial training to full-time employment with pre-identified entry
level jobs that drive the program’s training while earning a degree
relating to information technology, provided that the service is
designed to assist with environmental hurdles and with students
receiving accredited course credit from institutions for higher
education in the state of Missouri, and further provided that the
service includes a multi-year, wrap around support infrastructure
for each student that extends from the student’s acceptance into
the program through full time employment and continues until
the student completes a degree, if so requested by the program
participant, also known as HyperCare
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,250,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 1,750,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$46,524,884
Section 11.280. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 32
For a healthy marriage and fatherhood initiative delivered by a Missouri
nonprofit corporation at multiple locations throughout the state
of Missouri with a primary office located in a city with more than
one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$500,000
Section 11.285. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For support to Food Banks’ effort to provide services and food to low-
income individuals
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ..................$10,000,000
For an evidence-based program through a school-based early warning
and response system that improves student attendance, behavior,
and course performance in reading and math by identifying the
root causes for student absenteeism, classroom disruption, and
course failure
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,500,000
For after school support programs
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,000,000
For out of school support programs
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................2,000,000
For a nonprofit organization serving youth for over twenty years that
enables young people to reach their full potential as productive,
caring, responsible citizens by providing a club experience,
including after school and summer programs that assures success
located in any city with more than sixteen thousand but fewer
than eighteen thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of
a county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................3,500,000
For a century-old viable non-profit entity located in a city not within a
county that annually serves over one hundred thousand clients
regionally in efforts to deescalate violence and offer conflict
mediation and connects neighborhood residents with the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 33
necessary viable resources and services, in an effort to reduce
crime, violence, and to improve the quality of life
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(one-time) ................................................................................................ 1,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$19,000,000
Section 11.286. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a nonprofit organization founded in 2016 located in a city with more
than four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than
one county, that is providing access to fresh, affordable and
healthy foods to over 250,000 local residents experiencing food
insecurity
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$250,000
Section 11.290. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For out of school enrichment initiatives
Program Distribution
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................$7,000,000
Section 11.295. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For alternatives to abortion services, including the provision of diapers
and other infant hygiene products to women who qualify for
alternative to abortion services, provided that if the Department
grants or allocates funds to certain not-for-profit organizations or
regions of the state that are unused or anticipated to be unused,
then the Department shall redistribute such funds to other not-for-
profit organizations or regions of the state to ensure that all the
funds appropriated are available to serve women who qualify for
alternatives to abortion services, and further provided that the
Department shall not limit the amount that can be expended per
client
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,033,561
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..............................................50,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................10,300,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 34
For the alternatives to abortion public awareness program, including
assistance to contractors and subcontractors with the Department
for alternatives to abortion services, to help alternatives to
abortion agencies reach pregnant women at risk for having
abortions when such agencies are blocked or in any other way
suppressed by any search engine, social media platform, or digital
advertising network
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 550,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$12,933,561
Section 11.297. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For funding a multi-model, on-demand, micro-transit provision and/or
coordination in rural and suburban markets to enhance access to
health services (including, without limitation, mental, physical,
dental health services and pharmaceutical services); workforce
development training, to include educational opportunities,
apprenticeship programs, internships and other related workforce
programs and for mobility coordination, primarily for individuals
in areas of the state under-served by existing public transit
services and routes
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,000,000
Section 11.300. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For grants to organizations that promote and facilitate adoptions,
maternity homes, diaper banks, and organizations providing
material support and other assistance to individuals facing an
unintended pregnancy to help those individuals give birth to their
unborn children
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,500,000
Section 11.305. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a grant to an organization located in a city with more than thirty-six
thousand five hundred but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants
that promotes and facilitates adoptions, maternity homes,
material support and other assistance to individuals facing an

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 35
unintended pregnancy to help those individuals give birth to their
unborn children
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199)
(including $125,000 one-time)..........................................................................$625,000
Section 11.311. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a not-for-profit located in a city not within a county and founded in
1981, whose mission is to offer hope, empowerment,
compassion, hospitality and a chance for independence, to
provide substance abuse treatment support, family support
services, access to healthy foods and adequate shelter
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ...................................$500,000
Section 11.320. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For community services programs provided by Community Action
Agencies or other not-for-profit organizations under the
provisions of the Community Services Block Grant
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$23,437,056
Section 11.330. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Food Distribution Program, the receipt and disbursement of
Donated Food Program payments and for the Local Food
Purchase Assistance Cooperative Program
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$6,777,682
Section 11.331. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For a transitional housing facility project for the homeless that is
expected to house between 15 and 20 people, and would include
laundry, internet, showers, a communal living space, and a
kitchen for the residents in any county with more than two
hundred thousand but fewer than two hundred thirty thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,000,000
Section 11.335. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 36
For the Family Support Division
For the Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program, provided the
eligible household income does not exceed one hundred and fifty
percent (150%) of the federal poverty level or sixty percent
(60%) of the state median income (SMI)
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$93,620,002
Section 11.340. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For grants to not-for profit organizations for services and programs to
assist victims of domestic violence, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,000,000 one-time) ....................$5,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................3,000,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,600,000
For emergency shelter services to assist victims of domestic violence
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 562,137
Total .........................................................................................................................$10,162,137
Section 11.345. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For the Victims of Crime Act (VOCA) Unit
For the administrative expenses of the Victims of Crime Act program
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$27,827
Personal Service ..................................................................................................286,501
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 100,049
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146) ..........................................................386,550
For training and technical assistance expenses for the Victims of Crime
Act program
Expense and Equipment
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146) ............................................... 500,000
Total (Not to exceed 5.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$914,377
Section 11.350. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 37
For the Office of Workforce & Community Initiatives
For the Victims of Crime Act (VOCA) Unit
For grants to not-for-profit organizations for services and programs to
assist victims of crime
From Victims of Crime Act Federal Fund (1146) ...................................................$33,864,755
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202) (one-time) ...................................................................................... 9,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$42,864,755
Section 11.355. To the Department of Social Services
For the Family Support Division
For grants to not-for-profit organizations for services and programs to
assist victims of sexual assault, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,750,000
Section 11.360. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division administrative expenses, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,999,971
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,738,275
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,738,246
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,915,795
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,031,094
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,946,889
Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................944,470
Expense and Equipment
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ........................................... 55,944
Total (Not to exceed 75.43 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$7,685,549
Section 11.365. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Residential Program Unit
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,399,932

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 38
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 158,212
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,558,144
Personal Service ..................................................................................................573,659
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 22,589
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 596,248
Total (Not to exceed 33.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,154,392
Section 11.370. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Child Abuse and Neglect Hotline Unit
For administrative expenses, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,467,887
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 163,666
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 89.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$5,631,553
Section 11.375. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from
Section 11.375 to 11.370, and further provided that fifty percent
(50%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.375, 11.395,
and 11.400, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
For the Children’s Division field staff and operations administrative
expenses
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$45,168,617
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,098,188
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................47,266,805
Personal Service .............................................................................................42,952,511
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,192,497
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................46,145,008
Personal Service .............................................................................................14,812,919
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,818,397
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................16,631,316
Personal Service ....................................................................................................97,411

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 39
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 35,558
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................132,969
For recruitment and retention services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................613,496
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................550,504
For the expansion of a foster care portal software that can be accessed by
children’s division caseworkers, licensed foster families, foster
care licensure applicants, parents or guardians of children in
foster care, and other key parties to ensure streamlined
communication and information sharing
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 750,000
Total (Not to exceed 1,781.86 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$112,090,098
Section 11.380. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For Psychotropic Medication Reviews
For administration to monitor and track prescribed and administered
psychotropic medications to children in the custody of the
Children's Division, assist in the collection of medical records,
ensure informed consent of family members, provide secondary
reviews to prevent excessive dosages, and administer pre-service
and annual training to foster care case management staff and
resource providers
Personal Service ................................................................................................$250,134
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 45,768
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................295,902
Personal Service ....................................................................................................72,014
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 13,177
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..............................................85,191
Personal Service ....................................................................................................36,007
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,588
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 42,595
Total (Not to exceed 6.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$423,688
Section 11.385. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 40
For tuition assistance
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$77,000
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 231,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$308,000
Section 11.390. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For diligent search for relative placements
Personal Service ................................................................................................$749,220
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 150,906
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................900,126
Personal Service ..................................................................................................301,607
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 74,559
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 376,166
Total (Not to exceed 24.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$1,276,292
Section 11.395. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For administrative expenses of the Family Centered Services (FCS)
program, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed
between personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.375, 11.395, and 11.400
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,697,320
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 170,859
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,868,179
Personal Service ..................................................................................................805,879
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 65,681
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 871,560
For grants to nonprofit organizations for statewide prevention and
education efforts concerning human trafficking through a
program that reaches public and charter schools
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 41
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 150,000
Total (Not to exceed 20.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,889,739
Section 11.400. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Team Decision Making (TDM) administrative expenses,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment, and further
provided fifty percent (50%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.375, 11.395, and 11.400
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,730,173
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 174,962
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,905,135
Personal Service ..................................................................................................842,595
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 65,695
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 908,290
Total (Not to exceed 20.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,813,425
Section 11.405. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the development and integration of a new comprehensive child
welfare information system
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$6,345,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) (including
$4,545,000 one-time) .......................................................................................6,545,000
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .............................................................. 4,888,153
Total .........................................................................................................................$17,778,153
Section 11.410. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Children's Division staff training, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
For administrative staff expenses
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$55,294
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,531
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................67,825
Personal Service ....................................................................................................55,295

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 42
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 12,531
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..............................................67,826
Personal Service ....................................................................................................12,288
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,786
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ...........................15,074
For contracted training expenses
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,087,513
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 590,243
Total (Not to exceed 2.00 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$1,828,481
Section 11.415. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For a statewide specialist focused on prevention and response to sex
trafficking and sexual exploitation of children and for services for
child victims, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed
between personal services and expense and equipment
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$63,586
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,053
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................70,639
Personal Service ....................................................................................................37,345
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,141
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 41,486
Total (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$112,125
Section 11.420. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Birth Match Program as set forth in Section, 210.156 RSMo.
Personal Service
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .......................$110,755
Program Distribution
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 258,065
Total (Not to exceed 2.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$368,820
Section 11.421. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 43
For foster care treatment costs in an outdoor learning foster care program
that is licensed or accredited for treatment programming with the
reimbursement rate for this service determined by a cost study for
payment in addition to other service rates for the foster child,
provided that such reimbursement rate shall not exceed the
appropriation authority, and further provided that no funds shall
be expended to any vendor who fails to report a crime as required
by law and/or failed to remove an employee from duties related
to the treatment program upon becoming aware of a charge or
indictment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$183,385
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 316,615
Total ..............................................................................................................................$500,000
Section 11.425. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445,
11.455, 11.460, 11.485, 11.495, and 11.500, and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 11.910
For children’s treatment services including, but not limited to, home
based services, day treatment services, preventive services,
family reunification services, or intensive in-home services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,268,036
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................15,796,892
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ..............................................................................................50,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................425,286
For crisis care
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 2,316,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$33,856,214
Section 11.430. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For court ordered drug testing
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$578,763
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 118,924

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 44
Total ..............................................................................................................................$697,687
Section 11.435. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For foster care placement special expenses, respite services, and
transportation expenses; expenses related to training of foster
parents, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.455,
11.460, 11.485, 11.495, and 11.500
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,559,911
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................952,323
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,052,169
For awards to licensed community-based foster care and adoption
recruitment programs
From Foster Care and Adoptive Parents Recruitment and Retention Fund
(1979) ....................................................................................................... 15,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,579,403
Section 11.440. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For a 501(c)(3) not-for-profit corporation with more than 25 employees,
formed in 1991, with multiple office locations, and a principal
office located in a city with more than one hundred twenty-five
thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants
that primarily provides licensing, training, and advocacy of foster
parents, and operates a foster care neighborhood
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $500,000 one-time) ..........................$750,000
Section 11.445. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For foster care maintenance payments, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435,
11.445, 11.455, 11.460, 11.485, 11.495, and 11.500
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$53,077,630
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................20,500,957
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................20,314,073
From Alternative Care Trust Fund (1905) ........................................................... 2,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$95,892,660

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 45
Section 11.450. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For room and board expenses for children placed in a Therapeutic Foster
Care (TFC) home setting
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,566,746
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 1,902,621
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,469,367
Section 11.455. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For room and board expenses for children placed in Qualified Residential
Treatment Program designated facilities, provided twenty
percent (20%) flexibility is allowed between subsections within
this section, and further provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445,
11.455, 11.460, 11.485, 11.495, and 11.500, and further provided
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.455,
11.460, and 11.755
For placements in a Qualified Residential Treatment Program/non-
Institution for Mental Disease (QRTP/non-IMD) designated
facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$16,431,325
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................5,840,312
For placements in Qualified Residential Treatment Programs/Institution
for Mental Disease (QRTP/IMD) designated facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,028,471
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 841,752
Total .........................................................................................................................$28,141,860
Section 11.460. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For residential treatment placements and therapeutic treatment services;
and for the diversion of children from inpatient psychiatric
treatment and services provided through comprehensive,
expedited permanency systems of care for children and families,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.455, 11.460, 11.485,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 46
11.495, and 11.500, and further provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 11.455, 11.460, and
11.755
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$22,594,667
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................7,310,026
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 13,351,973
Total .........................................................................................................................$43,256,666
Section 11.465. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For contractual payments for expenses related to training of foster
parents
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$603,513
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 372,934
Total ..............................................................................................................................$976,447
Section 11.470. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For foster parent support
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,208,037
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 1,246,315
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,454,352
Section 11.475. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For costs associated with attending post-secondary education including,
but not limited to tuition, books, fees, room and board for current
or former foster youth, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$188,848
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,050,000
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 450,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,688,848
Section 11.480. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For comprehensive case management contracts through community
based organizations as described in Section 210.112, RSMo; the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 47
purpose of these contracts shall be to provide a system of care for
children living in foster care, independent living, or residential
care settings; services eligible under this provision may include,
but are not limited to, case management, foster care, residential
treatment, intensive in-home services, family reunification
services, and specialized recruitment and training of foster care
families, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$35,251,584
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 27,685,931
Total .........................................................................................................................$62,937,515
Section 11.485. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For adoption subsidy payments, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between subsections within this section, and further
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.455, 11.460, 11.485,
11.495, and 11.500
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$54,682,297
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................52,523,879
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................14,439,396
For guardianship subsidy payments, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between subsections within this section, and
further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.455, 11.460, 11.485,
11.495, and 11.500
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................19,947,541
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................15,798,651
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 11,860,598
Total .......................................................................................................................$169,252,362
Section 11.490. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For kinship navigator services
Program Distribution
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..........................................$372,318

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 48
Section 11.495. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division, provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445,
11.455, 11.460, 11.485, 11.495, and 11.500
For Family Resource Centers
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,403,564
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................14,383,316
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .........................989,075
For additional Behavioral Intervention Services in areas of need
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 900,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$26,675,955
Section 11.500. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For independent living placements and transitional living services,
provided five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed between
Sections 11.090, 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.455, 11.460, 11.485,
11.495, and 11.500
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,947,584
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 4,171,219
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,118,803
Section 11.505. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For Regional Child Assessment Centers, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,249,475
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................1,700,000
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 501,048
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,450,523
Section 11.510. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For Regional Child Assessment Centers
For services and programs administered through the statewide
association of Regional Child Assessment Centers aimed at
preventing and combating the commercial sexual exploitation of
children

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 49
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 11.515. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For residential placement payments to counties for children in the
custody of juvenile courts
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..........................................$175,000
Section 11.520. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For Court Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) IV-E allowable training
costs
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ..........................................$150,000
Section 11.525. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For the Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Grant and Children’s Justice
Act Grant
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$1,251,341
Section 11.530. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children's Division
For payments to one or more contractors to assist the Division with
application and administration of benefits on behalf of a child or
youth and to establish and administer accounts for a child or
youth which include but not limited to a special needs trust, a
pooled special needs trust, an ABLE account, or any other trust
account
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,356,992
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 507,008
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,864,000
Section 11.535. To the Department of Social Services
For the Children’s Division
For transactions involving personal funds of children to: transfer funds
to accounts set up for the child; to make payments directly to the
child; to return the funds to the corresponding funding agency; to
fund "Unmet needs", needs for which the division is not required

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 50
by law to provide financial support; or dispose of the funds as
otherwise required by law
From Alternative Care Trust Fund (1905) ...............................................................$12,000,000
Section 11.540. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Youth Services
For the Central Office and regional offices, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,104,048
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 81,097
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,185,145
Personal Service ..................................................................................................262,539
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 13,855
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ............................................................................................276,394
Personal Service ..................................................................................................984,541
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 86,779
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ......................1,071,320
Expense and Equipment
From Youth Services Treatment Fund (1843) ..................................................... 999
Total (Not to exceed 39.30 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,533,858
Section 11.545. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Youth Services
For treatment services, including foster care and contractual payments,
provided up to $500,000 can be used for juvenile court diversion,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between federal
funds, and further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$25,775,382
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,095,642
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................26,871,024
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,257,097

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 51
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,065,899
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .........................................................................................8,322,996
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,149,407
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,125,033
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,274,440
Personal Service .............................................................................................13,190,742
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,514,715
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) ....................14,705,457
Personal Service ...............................................................................................3,999,304
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,854,832
From Department of Social Services Educational Improvement Fund
(1620) ...............................................................................................................7,854,136
Personal Service ..................................................................................................178,072
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,106
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................187,178
Expense and Equipment
From Youth Services Products Fund (1764) ......................................................................5,000
For overtime to non-exempt state employees and/or for paying otherwise
authorized personal service expenditures in lieu of such overtime
payments; non-exempt state employees identified by Section
105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any remaining funds to be
used to pay overtime to any other state employees
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,133,414
For payment distribution of Social Security benefits received on behalf
of youth in care
From Division of Youth Services Child Benefits Fund (1727) ........................... 200,000
Total (Not to exceed 1,016.38 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$61,553,645
Section 11.550. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Youth Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 52
For incentive payments to counties for community-based treatment
programs for youth, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,479,486
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ............................................................. 500,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,979,486
Section 11.600. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For administrative services, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,035,508
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,452,304
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................11,487,812
Personal Service ...............................................................................................8,983,345
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 14,312,317
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................23,295,662
Personal Service ..................................................................................................555,338
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 55,553
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114) ............................................................................610,891
Personal Service ..................................................................................................528,593
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,988,041
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ...................................................6,516,634
Personal Service ..................................................................................................135,943
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 232,708
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) .................................................368,651
Personal Service ....................................................................................................34,086
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 356
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ...............................................34,442
Personal Service ..................................................................................................113,122
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,281
From Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund (1271) ......................................................123,403
Personal Service ..................................................................................................566,877

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 53
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 41,385
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................608,262
Personal Service ....................................................................................................57,920
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 425,372
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ....................................483,292
Expense and Equipment
From Life Sciences Research Trust Fund (1763) ...............................................................3,000
Personal Service
From Missouri Rx Plan Fund (1779) ..............................................................................443,129
Personal Service ....................................................................................................23,682
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 878,466
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) ................... 902,148
Total (Not to exceed 239.70 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$44,877,326
Section 11.605. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For clinical services management related to the administration of the MO
HealthNet Pharmacy fee-for-service and managed care programs
and administration of the Missouri Rx Plan, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$450,191
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................2,214,032
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114) ............................................................................497,648
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ......................................................924,911
From Missouri Rx Plan Fund (1779) ................................................................... 62,947
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,149,729
Section 11.610. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For MO HealthNet Transformation initiatives
Personal Service ................................................................................................$447,214
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,460,009
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,907,223

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 54
Personal Service ..................................................................................................449,717
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,064,965
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................6,514,682
For costs to assess existing health data systems and establish a unified,
statewide health data standard and governance approach to
support data sharing and modernization efforts across state health
agencies
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .........................................................1,495,000
For purposes of a NEMT program redesign, including analysis and
implementation support, to ensure efficiency and accountability
in the operations of NEMT, and for the purposes of a rapid
response review of the Medicaid program for Fraud, Waste and
Abuse current state and recommendations
Personal Service ....................................................................................................55,419
Expense and Equipment (including $1,652,789 one-time) ...................... 1,659,128
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,714,547
Personal Service ....................................................................................................43,543
Expense and Equipment (including $1,652,192 one-time) ...................... 1,657,173
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 1,700,716
Total (Not to exceed 14.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$13,332,168
Section 11.615. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Rural Health Transformation Program, provided twenty five
percent (25%) flexibility is allowed between subsections within
this section
For the Rural Health Transformation Office
For Administrative Expenses
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,095,992
Expense and Equipment ............................................................................ 209,074
From Rural Health Transformation Fund (1125) .........................................................1,305,066
For Regional Coordinating Networks and Local Community Hubs
Program Distribution
From Rural Health Transformation Fund (1125) .......................................................46,200,267

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 55
For Alternative Payment Models and Shared-Savings Models
Program Distribution
From Rural Health Transformation Fund (1125) .......................................................22,520,316
For digital backbone to create statewide interoperability
Program Distribution
From Rural Health Transformation Fund (1125) .......................................................62,494,555
For Rural Health Workforce Programs
Program Distribution
From Rural Health Transformation Fund (1125) .......................................................17,877,529
For continuing medical education of physicians that will be required to
obtain one (1) hour of nutritional training from 20 CSR 2150-
2.125
Program Distribution
From Rural Health Transformation Fund (1125) .........................................................1,000,000
For Provider Transformation
Program Distribution
From Rural Health Transformation Fund (1125) ................................................. 64,879,085
Total (Not to exceed 13.46 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$216,276,818
Section 11.620. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the MO HealthNet Data Management Office administrative expenses
Personal Service ................................................................................................$225,394
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,541
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................234,935
Personal Service ..................................................................................................453,477
Expense and Equipment .......................................................................... 23,632
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 477,109
Total (Not to exceed 10.00 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................$712,044
Section 11.625. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For fees associated with third-party collections and other revenue
maximization cost avoidance fees
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 56
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .....................................$12,200,000
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ........................................... 12,200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$24,400,000
Section 11.629. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For contracted staff to support the procurement, implementation, and
oversight of modular Medicaid enterprise systems, including
planning, procurement, transition, and vendor management
activities
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$79,984
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,380
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................................90,364
Personal Service ..................................................................................................466,825
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 24,220
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 491,045
Total (Not to exceed 8.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$581,409
Section 11.630. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Missouri Medicaid Information System (MMIS)
For the operation of the information systems, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between subsections within this section, and
further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 11.910
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $125,000 one-time) .......................$1,125,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610)
(including $375,000 one-time) .........................................................................1,375,000
From Uncompensated Care Fund (1108) ........................................................................430,000
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................1,591,687
For the operation of the Business Intelligence Solution – Enterprise Data
Warehouse (BIS-EDW)
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,991,593
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................7,770,710

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 57
For the operation of the Beneficiary Support and Premiums Collections
Solution and Services (BSPC) – Enrollment Broker and the
procurement of a MMIS Enrollment Broker Solution
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................4,812,763
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................8,934,245
For the operation of the Clinical Management Services and Pharmacy
Claims and Prior Authorization (CMSP) and the procurement of
a MMIS Prior Authorization Solution and Interoperability Rule
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,517,762
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................25,657,641
For the operation of the pharmacy system and support services -
Pharmacy Solution
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,477,652
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................12,567,081
For the operation of the Managed Care Contract Management Tool
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................688,826
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................5,833,540
For the MMIS Fiscal Agent Contract and the procurement of a MMIS
Core Claims Solution
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................27,493,017
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................85,755,382
For the operation of the MMIS EVV Aggregator Solution (EAS) and the
procurement of a MMIS EVV Solution
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,841,186
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .........................................7,835,958
For transition services related to the procurement of MMIS solutions
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,442,192

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 58
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 21,979,722
Total .......................................................................................................................$228,120,957
Section 11.635. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the purpose of supporting the transformation of any or all of the
state's existing Health Information Exchanges into a Health Data
Utility by providing funds to enhance the existing HIE
infrastructure for the purpose of data analysis focused on
supporting MO HealthNet. Data analytics provided through the
HIE(s) shall provide analysis to MO HealthNet and members
focused on enhancing care delivery and system efficiency in the
MO HealthNet program and improving health care delivery and
outcomes in under-served communities. All HIEs shall be
required to maintain strict compliance with all patient privacy
protections under HIPAA and any other applicable state or
federal laws
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 45,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$50,000,000
Section 11.640. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Money Follows the Person Program
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) .......................................$1,532,549
Section 11.700. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
For pharmaceutical payments under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program, professional fees for pharmacists, and for a
comprehensive chronic care risk management program, provided
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection
and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735,
11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830,
and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$112,672,971
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................................904,447,912

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 59
From Pharmacy Rebates Fund (1114) .....................................................................260,835,622
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ...................................................4,217,574
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ........................................35,376,122
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................3,543,350
From Premium Fund (1885) ........................................................................................3,800,000
For Medicare Part D Clawback payments, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 393,562,240
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,718,455,791
Section 11.705. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the purpose of funding pharmaceutical payments under the Missouri
Rx Plan authorized by Sections 208.780 through 208.798, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,186,226
From Missouri Rx Plan Fund (1779) ................................................................... 1,188,774
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,375,000
Section 11.710. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance payments as provided by law
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................................$8,390,850
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ................................. 4,609,150
Total .........................................................................................................................$13,000,000
Section 11.715. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For physician services and related services including, but not limited to,
clinic and podiatry services, telemedicine services, physician
sponsored services and fees, laboratory and x-ray services,
asthma related services, diabetes prevention and obesity related
services, services provided by chiropractic physicians, and
family planning services under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program, and for a comprehensive chronic care risk management
program, and Major Medical Prior Authorization, provided ten

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 60
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and
Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755,
11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and
11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$215,794,227
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................................405,519,822
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ...............................................10,000
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ...........................................................................1,427,081
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ......................................................241,046
For payment of physician and related services to Certified Community
Behavioral Health Organizations (CCBHO), provided that
Applied Behavioral Analysis (ABA) services are included in the
CCBHO Prospective Payment System
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................50,329,761
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................................. 56,716,924
Total .......................................................................................................................$730,038,861
Section 11.720. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Program for All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE), provided
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection
and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735,
11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830,
and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,566,850
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................................. 9,871,070
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,437,920
Section 11.725. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For dental services under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service program,
including adult dental procedure codes (Tier 1-6), provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and
Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 61
11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and
11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,541,033
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .........................................................................................9,950,833
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 71,162
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,563,028
Section 11.730. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to third-party insurers, employers, or policy holders for
health insurance, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715,
11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775,
11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further provided
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$136,900,455
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................................. 270,491,167
Total .......................................................................................................................$407,391,622
Section 11.735. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For funding long-term care services
For care in nursing facilities under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program and for contracted services to develop model policies
and practices that improve the quality of life for long-term care
residents, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720,
11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780,
11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further provided five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from this subsection to the
value based incentive payments to nursing facilities subsection
within this section
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$340,909,914
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................................760,903,092
From Uncompensated Care Fund (1108) ...................................................................58,516,478

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 62
From Third Party Liability Collections Fund (1120) ...................................................6,992,981
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ................................9,500,000
For value-based incentive payments to nursing facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................12,330,612
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................................22,447,591
For home health for the elderly under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720,
11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780,
11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................834,886
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .........................................................................................2,052,783
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ................................................................... 159,305
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,214,647,642
Section 11.740. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For funding long-term care services
For Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance payments as provided
by law
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................................$240,741,466
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ........................ 132,240,896
Total .......................................................................................................................$372,982,362
Section 11.745. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For rehabilitative and preventative care services ordered by a physician
and delivered by an Assisted Living Facility, provided one
hundred percent (100%) flexibility is allowed between funds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................................. 1
Total .........................................................................................................................................$2

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 63
Section 11.750. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For publicly funded long-term care services and support contracts and
funding supplemental payments for care in nursing facilities
under the nursing facility upper payment limit
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................................$7,068,173
From Long Term Support UPL Fund (1724) ....................................................... 3,882,595
Total .........................................................................................................................$10,950,768
Section 11.755. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For all other non-institutional services including, but not limited to,
rehabilitation, optometry, audiology, ambulance, non-emergency
medical transportation, durable medical equipment, and
eyeglasses under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service program, and
for rehabilitation services provided by residential treatment
facilities as authorized by the Children’s Division for children in
the care and custody of the Children’s Division, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and
Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755,
11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and
11.840, and further provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 11.455, 11.460, and 11.755
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $601,942 one-time) ...................$144,819,437
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) (including $1,095,821 one-time) ................................266,965,185
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ................................1,414,043
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) ..............................................................................194,881
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) .........................10,491,302
For non-emergency medical transportation, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................20,488,557
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................................37,775,900

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 64
For the federal share of MO HealthNet reimbursable non-emergency
medical transportation for public entities
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................................. 2,555,469
Total .......................................................................................................................$484,704,774
Section 11.760. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to providers of ground emergency medical transportation
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................................$40,659,479
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ......................... 22,533,055
Total .........................................................................................................................$63,192,534
Section 11.765. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For complex rehabilitation technology items classified within the
Medicare program as of January 1, 2014 as durable medical
equipment that are individually configured for individuals to
meet their specific and unique medical, physical, and functional
needs and capacities for basic activities of daily living and
instrumental activities of daily living identified as medically
necessary to prevent hospitalization and/or institutionalization of
a complex needs patient; such items shall include, but not be
limited to, complex rehabilitation power wheelchairs, highly
configurable manual wheelchairs, adaptive seating and
positioning systems, and other specialized equipment such as
standing frames and gait trainers, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between this section and Sections 11.700,
11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770,
11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,343,425
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................................. 8,587,237
Total .........................................................................................................................$12,930,662
Section 11.770. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 65
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payment to comprehensive prepaid health care plans for the general
plan as provided by federal or state law or for payments to
programs authorized by the Frail Elderly Demonstration Project
Waiver as provided by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act
of 1990 (P.L.101-508, Section 4744) and by Section 208.152
(16), RSMo, provided that the department shall implement
programs or measures to achieve cost-savings through
emergency room services reform, and further provided that MO
HealthNet eligibles described in Section 501(a)(1)(D) of Title V
of the Social Security Act may voluntarily enroll in the Managed
Care Program, and further provided that the Department shall
direct its contracted actuary to develop an Aged, Blind, and
Disabled rate cell inside the MO HealthNet Managed Care
program to reflect the cost of those members choosing to be
enrolled in a managed care plan, and further provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $883,681 one-time) ...................$494,178,723
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) (including $1,608,723 one-time) .............................1,852,370,489
From Uncompensated Care Fund (1108) ...................................................................33,848,436
From Health Initiatives Fund (1275) .........................................................................18,590,380
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ..........................................318,659,260
From Healthy Families Trust Fund (1625) ................................................................14,435,373
From Life Sciences Research Trust Fund (1763) ......................................................26,697,272
From Premium Fund (1885) ........................................................................................9,259,854
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) ...........................2,892,711
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) .............................................................................................................34,807,441
For supplemental payments to Tier 1 Safety Net Hospitals, or to any
affiliated physician group that provides physicians for any Tier 1
Safety Net Hospital, for physician and other healthcare
professional services as approved by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................................44,621,663

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 66
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) .............................................................................................................24,510,978
For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032
RSMo, when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................................33,337,870
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ......................... 18,828,147
Total ....................................................................................................................$2,927,038,597
Section 11.771. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For a mobile MRI and trailer for a hospital located in any city with more
than sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand
inhabitants and located in more than one county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$1,500,000
Section 11.775. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payment to a comprehensive prepaid health care plan for the
specialty plan as provided by federal or state law or for payments
to programs authorized by the Frail Elderly Demonstration
Project Waiver as provided by the Omnibus Budget
Reconciliation Act of 1990 (P.L. 101-508, Section 4744) and by
Section 208.152 (16), RSMo, and further provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between this section and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$130,098,206
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................................286,192,727
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ............................................45,994,611
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) ..............................300,000
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ...............................................................................................................6,221,543
For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 67
RSMo, when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .........................................................................................2,261,087
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ......................... 1,276,988
Total .......................................................................................................................$472,345,162
Section 11.780. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For hospital care under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service program,
graduate medical education, and for a comprehensive chronic
care risk management program, provided that the MO HealthNet
Division shall track payments to out-of-state hospitals by
location, and further provided the department seek a waiver of
the institutions for mental disease (IMD) exclusion for inpatient
mental health treatment for MO HealthNet participants in
psychiatric hospitals pursuant to Section 12003 of the 21st
Century Cures Act with the state share through the federal
reimbursement allowance; and further provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$26,705,177
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................................354,053,962
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ..........................................119,171,256
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ...............................................15,709
For rate increases for inpatient hospital psychiatric care
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................8,363,750
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................................16,136,250
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) .................................................500,000
For Safety Net Payments
From Healthy Families Trust Fund (1625) .......................................................... 30,365,444
Total .......................................................................................................................$555,311,548
Section 11.785. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 68
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Transformation of Rural Community Health (ToRCH) Rural
Hospital Health Hub
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,750,000
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .........................................................................................7,500,000
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ...................................... 3,750,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,000,000
Section 11.790. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to Tier 1 Safety Net Hospitals for enhanced rates to
providers and to plan and develop a regional Barriers to Care
proposal while maximizing eligible costs for federal Medicaid
funds, utilizing current state and local funding sources as match
for services that are not currently matched with federal Medicaid
payments
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................................$12,613,590
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ....................................................................................................... 1,709,202
Total .........................................................................................................................$14,322,792
Section 11.795. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division,
For indirect medical education (IME) payments to public acute care
safety net hospitals who serve as the primary teaching hospitals
for the state’s two public medical schools, University of
Missouri-Columbia School of Medicine and University of
Missouri-Kansas City School of Medicine; payments from this
section are for the difference between IME payments paid under
the Diagnosis-Related Group (DRG) methodology and 100% of
allowable funds
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .....................................................................................$12,721,240
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ....................................................................................................... 6,987,862
Total .........................................................................................................................$19,709,102

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 69
Section 11.800. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 11.910
For Federally Qualified Health Centers (FQHCs)
For grants to Federally Qualified Health Centers
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$257,732
Section 11.805. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For Federally Qualified Health Centers (FQHCs)
For a grant program for a substance abuse prevention network for a
FQHC located in a county with more than two hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than three hundred thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................250,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................1,100,000
For a grant program for a substance abuse prevention network
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ............................................250,000
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 2,100,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,700,000
Section 11.810. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to technical assistance contractors under Section 330(l) or
330(m) of the Public Health Services Act to assist FQHCs with
outreach and engagement of Medicaid beneficiaries assigned to
FQHCs, to address gaps in preventive services and management
of chronic conditions, and for incentive payments
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,918,645
From Department of Social Services Federal Fund (1610) ................................. 1,918,645
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,837,290
Section 11.815. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For health homes, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720,

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 70
11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780,
11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,270,273
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) .......................................................................................21,978,561
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ...................................... 7,893,011
Total .........................................................................................................................$34,141,845
Section 11.820. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to hospitals under the Federal Reimbursement Allowance
Program including state costs to pay for an independent audit of
Disproportionate Share Hospital payments as required by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, for the expenses of
the Poison Control Center in order to provide services to all
hospitals within the state
For a continuation of the services provided through Medicaid Emergency
Psychiatric Demonstration as required by Section 208.152(16),
RSMo
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................................$648,177,591
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ...................................... 377,298,284
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,025,475,875
Section 11.825. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For funding programs to enhance access to care for uninsured children
using fee-for-service, prepaid health plans, or other alternative
service delivery and reimbursement methodology approved by
the director of the Department of Social Services, provided that
families of children receiving services under this section shall pay
the following premiums to be eligible to receive such services:
zero percent on the amount of a family's income which is less
than or equal to 150 percent of the federal poverty level; four
percent on the amount of a family's income which is less than or
equal to 185 percent of the federal poverty level but greater than
150 percent of the federal poverty level; eight percent on the
amount of a family's income which is less than or equal to 225
percent of the federal poverty level but greater than 185 percent

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 71
of the federal poverty level; fourteen percent on the amount of a
family's income which is less than or equal to 300 percent of the
federal poverty level but greater than 225 percent of the federal
poverty level not to exceed five percent of total income; families
with an annual income of more than 300 percent of the federal
poverty level are ineligible for this program, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between this section and Sections
11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765,
11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$118,789,914
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...........................................................................................................439,596,328
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ...............................................................................................................6,089,434
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ............................................16,430,704
For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032
RSMo, when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...............................................................................................................2,459,831
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ......................... 831,401
Total .......................................................................................................................$584,197,612
Section 11.830. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For the Show-Me Healthy Babies Program authorized by Section
208.662, RSMo, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between this subsection and Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720,
11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755, 11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780,
11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and 11.840, and further provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$22,309,571
From Title XXI Children’s Health Insurance Program Federal Fund
(1159) ...........................................................................................................117,166,237
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ...............................................................................................................1,279,507

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 72
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ...................................... 7,467,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$148,222,315
Section 11.835. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For MO HealthNet services for the Department of Elementary and
Secondary Education under the MO HealthNet fee-for-service
program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$242,525
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................................. 120,090,322
Total .......................................................................................................................$120,332,847
Section 11.840. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For medical benefits for blind individuals ineligible for MO HealthNet
coverage who receive the Missouri Blind Pension cash grant,
provided that individuals under this section shall pay the
following premiums to be eligible to receive such services: zero
percent on the amount of a family's income which is less than 150
percent of the federal poverty level; four percent on the amount
of a family's income which is less than 185 percent of the federal
poverty level but greater than or equal to 150 percent of the
federal poverty level; eight percent of the amount on a family's
income which is less than 225 percent of the federal poverty level
but greater than or equal to 185 percent of the federal poverty
level; fourteen percent on the amount of a family's income which
is less than 300 percent of the federal poverty level but greater
than or equal to 225 percent of the federal poverty level not to
exceed five percent of total income; families with an annual
income equal to or greater than 300 percent of the federal poverty
level are ineligible for this program, and further provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between this subsection and
Sections 11.700, 11.715, 11.720, 11.725, 11.730, 11.735, 11.755,
11.765, 11.770, 11.775, 11.780, 11.815, 11.825, 11.830, and
11.840, and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 11.910
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$24,444,104

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 73
Section 11.845. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For program distributions related to Section 36(c) of Article IV of the
Missouri Constitution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $337,760 one-time) ...................$395,298,492
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) (including
$3,039,841 one-time) ................................................................................4,249,826,500
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ..........................................2,146,956
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ................................2,146,151
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) ..............................565,267
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ............................................62,936,427
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ...............................................................................................................8,801,437
For supplemental payments to Tier 1 Safety Net Hospitals, or to any
affiliated physician group that provides physicians for any Tier 1
Safety Net Hospital, for physician and other healthcare
professional services as approved by the Centers for Medicare
and Medicaid Services
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) ..........................................43,697,736
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ...............................................................................................................4,855,304
For payments to the Department of Mental Health for Community
Psychiatric Rehabilitation (CPR) services, Comprehensive
Substance Abuse Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR)
services, Targeted Case Management (TCM) for behavioral
health services, and Certified Community Behavioral Health
Organizations (CCBHO) for MO HealthNet participants and the
uninsured
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) ........................................362,039,310
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) .............................................................................................................40,226,590
For payments to providers of public ground emergency medical
transportation, pursuant to Sections 208.1030 and 208.1032
RSMo, when providing services to persons paid for under this
section
From Title XIX - Adult Expansion Federal Fund (1358) ..........................................20,956,916

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 74
From Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Fund (1422) ......................... 2,328,546
Total ....................................................................................................................$5,195,825,632
Section 11.850. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund for the purpose of providing the state
match for Medicaid payments
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) .........................................................................................................$122,616,197
Section 11.855. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For payments to the Department of Mental Health for Community
Psychiatric Rehabilitation (CPR) services, Comprehensive
Substance Abuse Treatment and Rehabilitation (CSTAR)
services, Targeted Case Management (TCM) for behavioral
health services, and Certified Community Behavioral Health
Organizations (CCBHO) for MO HealthNet participants and the
uninsured
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ...................................................................................$628,579,055
From Department of Social Services Intergovernmental Transfer Fund
(1139) ....................................................................................................... 305,093,236
Total .......................................................................................................................$933,672,291
Section 11.860. To the Department of Social Services
For the MO HealthNet Division
For family planning and family planning-related services, pregnancy
testing, sexually transmitted disease testing and treatment,
including pap tests and pelvic exams, and follow-up services,
provided that none of the funds appropriated herein may be paid,
granted to, or expended to directly or indirectly fund procedures
or administrative functions of any clinic, physician's office, or
any other place or facility in which abortions are performed or
induced other than a hospital, or any affiliate of any such clinic,
physician's office, or place or facility in which abortions are
performed or induced other than a hospital, or for performing,
inducing, or assisting in the performance or inducing of an
abortion which is not necessary to save the life of the mother, for

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 75
encouraging a patient to have an abortion or referring a patient
for an abortion which is not necessary to save the life of the
mother, or developing or dispensing drugs, chemicals, or devices
intended to be used to induce an abortion which is not necessary
to save the life of the mother. Such services shall be available to
uninsured women who are at least eighteen (18) to fifty-five (55)
years of age with a family Modified Adjusted Gross Income for
the household size that does not exceed two hundred and one
percent (201%) of the Federal Poverty Level (FPL) and who is a
legal resident of the state
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,208,096 one-time) ....................$1,871,711
From Title XIX Department of Social Services Medicaid Assistance
Federal Fund (1163) ................................................................................. 1,208,096
Total ...........................................................................................................................$3,079,807
Section 11.865. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$38,737,111
Section 11.870. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Pharmacy Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1144) ......................................$38,737,111
Section 11.875. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$20,837,332
Section 11.880. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Ambulance Service Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1958) .......................$20,837,332
Section 11.885. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Federal
Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$718,701,378

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 76
Section 11.890. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Federal Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1142) ........................................$718,701,378
Section 11.895. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$210,950,510
Section 11.900. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ..........................$210,950,510
Section 11.905. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Nursing Facility Quality of Care Fund in accordance with Section
198.418.1, RSMo, to be used by the Department of Health and
Senior Services for conducting inspections and surveys and
providing training and technical assistance to facilities licensed
under the provisions of Chapter 198
From Nursing Facility Reimbursement Allowance Fund (1196) ..............................$1,500,000
Section 11.910. To the Department of Social Services
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury, for the
payment of claims, premiums, and expenses as provided by
Section 105.711 through 105.726, RSMo, to the State Legal
Expense Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
PART 2
Section 11.2005. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.080 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of reimbursement rates
greater than $17 per day.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 77
Section 11.2010. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.160 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of contract rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025.
Section 11.2015. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.215 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of Blind Pension rates
greater than $949 per month and $794 per month for
Supplemental Aid to the Blind.
Section 11.2017. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.421 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of outdoor learning
foster care program provider rates greater than $258 per day.
Section 11.2020. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.425, 11.435, 11.445, 11.450, 11.455,
11.460, 11.480, 11.485, 11.495, 11.545, 11.765, 11.775, 11.780
and 11.815 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025.
Section 11.2025. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.450, 11.755 and 11.775 of Part 1 of
this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of Therapeutic Foster
Care provider rates greater than: $173.08 per day for Level 1,
$262.02 per day for Level II.
Section 11.2030. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.455, 11.755 and 11.775 of Part 1 of
this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of QRTP/non-IMD
and QRTP/IMD rates greater than: $194.47 per day for Level II,
$239.16 per day for Level III, $253.80 per day for Level IV.
Section 11.2035. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 78
In reference to Sections 11.455, 11.460, 11.755 and 11.775 of
Part 1 of this act:
Expenses for children placed in a residential treatment facility
shall be covered for placements ordered by the court and not
recommended by an independent assessor.
Section 11.2040. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.455, 11.460, 11.755, 11.775 and
11.780 of Part 1 of this act:
Provided that funding may be expended for the purposes of
transitioning children in the Children’s Division custody from a
current stay or preventing a stay in: 1) an out of state placement,
2) a hospital boarding arrangement, or 3) hotel boarding
arrangement.
Section 11.2045. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.440 and 11.780 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of Psychiatric
Residential Treatment Facility (PRTF) provider rates greater than
$471.46 per day.
Section 11.2050. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.715 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of physician provider
rates greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2024, except
rates for Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics, for
which no funds shall be expended in furtherance of actuarial rates
greater than those approved by the Department of Mental Health,
and further excepting rates for autism services, for which no
funds shall be expended in furtherance of autism rates paid by the
Department of Mental Health on January 1, 2025, and further
excepting independent lab rates, for which no funds shall be
expended in furtherance of 90% of the calendar year 2023
Medicare allowed rate, and further excepting ophthalmologist
rates, for which no funds shall be expended in furtherance of 85%
of the calendar year 2023 Medicare allowed rate, and further
excepting anesthesia rates for dental services, for which no funds
shall be expended greater than 63% of the Medicare conversion

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 79
factor for anesthesia services for dental procedures performed in
medical surgical centers.
Section 11.2055. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.725 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of dental provider
rates greater than the rate in effect on January 1, 2025, except for
dental anesthesia codes, for which no funds shall be expended in
furtherance of 80% of the 50th percentile of the comparable
Usual Customary and Reasonable (UCR) rates on January 1,
2024, and further excepting dentist extraction rates, for which no
funds shall be expended in furtherance of dentist extraction codes
to 38.5% of the 50th percentile of the comparable UCR rates on
January 1, 2024.
Section 11.2060. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.735 and 11.740 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of nursing facility
provider rates greater than the rebased rate, in the aggregate,
determined by the FY2022 nursing facility cost reports, excepting
case mix index adjustments and value based payment
adjustments. No funds shall be expended in furtherance of home
health provider rates greater than $12.42 per visit of the rate in
effect on January 1, 2024. No funds shall be expended for
Certified Nursing Assistant (CNA) training reimbursement
greater than $1,500 per enrollee.
Section 11.2065. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.755 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of rehabilitation and
specialty provider rates greater than the rate in effect on January
1, 2025, except providers of non-emergency medical
transportation for MO HealthNet and Department of Mental
Health for which no funds shall be expended in furtherance of
provider rates greater than the lower bound actuarial soundness
rate, and further excepting providers of hospice care, for which
no funds shall be expended in furtherance of provider rates
greater than 2.8% for routine home care, continuous care,
inpatient respite care, and general inpatient care greater than the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 80
blended rate in effect on January 1, 2025, and for which no funds
shall be expended in furtherance of rates no greater than 95% of
the nursing facility per diem rate for room and board for services
provided in a nursing facility, and further excepting air
ambulance provider rates for whom no funds shall be expended
in furtherance of provider rates greater than 90% of the Medicare
calendar year 2024 rate from the rate in effect on December 30,
2023.
Section 11.2070. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.770 and 11.775 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of managed care
contract rates greater than the lower bound actuarial soundness
rate.
Section 11.2075. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.780 and 11.820 in Part 1 of this act:
Provided that in-patient Medicaid psychiatric free-standing
hospitals have a minimum rate equivalent to the state fiscal year
2025 weighted average daily rate of $1,194.22.
Section 11.2080. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.780 and 11.820 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended for out-of-state payments.
Section 11.2085. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.780 and 11.820 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of the outpatient
hospital services fee schedule greater than 90% of the calendar
year 2026 Medicare rate.
Section 11.2090. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.815 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of a PMPM rate
greater than $80.19 for primary care health homes.
Section 11.2095. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections except for Section 11.845 in Part 1 of
this act:

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 81
No funds shall be expended for program distributions related to
Section 36(c) of Article IV of the Missouri Constitution.
Section 11.2100. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to section 11.720 of Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be expended in furtherance of capitation rates
greater than the Amount that Would have been Otherwise Paid
(AWOP) under Fee-for-Service.
Section 11.2105. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.700 of Part 1 of this act:
The Department shall analyze and report the foregone
supplemental rebates associated with drugs purchased under 42
U.S.C. Section 256b for participants in the MO HealthNet
Program to the House Budget and Senate Appropriation
Committee Chairs and Ranking Members. The report shall be
submitted quarterly and include aggregate foregone supplemental
rebates associated with drugs purchased under 42 U.S.C. Section
256b for participants in the MO HealthNet Program to the extent
permissible by state and federal law. The report shall be inclusive
of the data available at the time the report is generated and contain
up to four (4) prior quarters. The first report shall be due
November 1, 2026 with quarterly updates thereafter.
PART 3
Section 11.3002. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.052 of Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide quarterly reports related to the
transition of operations and technology and procurement
compliance and efficiencies to the Office of the Governor and the
House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs.
Section 11.3005. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Section 11.435 of Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
Special expenses for clothing allowances shall be paid at least
quarterly.
Section 11.3010. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 82
In reference to Sections 11.620 and 11.630 of Part 1 and Part 2
of this act:
The Department shall provide the House Appropriations and
Senate Appropriations Offices of the General Assembly access to
department-wide data warehouses and analytics platforms not
otherwise available to the General Assembly and necessary to
make data-driven decisions. This section shall not be construed
to compel the release of protected health information or
individually identifiable data.
Section 11.3015. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to Sections 11.770 and 11.775 of Part 1 and Part 2
of this act:
Contract changes shall be provided in writing, prior to
submission to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services,
to the House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs
and Ranking Members.
Section 11.3020. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written notification, prior to
submission to the federal government, of state plans and state
plan amendments, Advanced Planning Documents,
Implementation Advanced Planning Documents, grant
applications, and Medicaid waivers to the House Budget and
Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs and Ranking Members.
The Department shall include in the notification the actual
documents submitted to the federal government, as well as the
federal government’s responses when received.
Section 11.3025. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
In reference to the Alternative Care Trust Fund (1905), the
Department shall provide a quarterly accounting of the money to
the parents of the child for whose benefit the funds have been
received by the Department; to the guardian ad litem; and to the
child, if the child is 15 years or older.
Section 11.3030. To the Department of Social Services

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 83
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written documentation of rate
setting, rate studies, time surveys, time studies, and random
moment time studies, and the federal and state share fiscal impact
estimates, including Title IV-E Foster Care eligibility and
participation rates to the House Budget and Senate Appropriation
Committee Chairs and Ranking Members.
Section 11.3035. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written notification and
correspondence from the federal government of non-compliance
with federal programs or grants to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs and Ranking Members.
Section 11.3040. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide copies of financial reports and
public assistance cost allocation plans submitted to the federal
government and supporting cash on hand reports, by grant, to the
House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs and
Ranking Members.
Section 11.3045. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide monthly expenditures and
projections for Child Welfare programs and Medicaid programs
for the current state fiscal year and next state fiscal year to the
House Budget and Senate Appropriation Committee Chairs and
Ranking Members on a monthly basis.
Section 11.3050. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
The Department shall provide written notification of spend plans
and spend plan amendments to the House Budget and Senate
Appropriation Committee Chairs and Ranking Members prior to
submission to the federal government and prior to expenditure of
such funds.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2011 84
Section 11.3052. To the Department of Social Services
In reference to all sections in Part 1 and Part 2 of this act:
By or before September 1, 2026 the Office of State Courts
Administrator and the Department of Social Services shall
execute a memorandum of understanding that provides for access
to court orders necessary for the Department of Social Services
to ensure timely delivery of case information to relevant agencies
and to maximize federal funding for children in the state foster
care program, including funds available through Part E of Title
IV of the Social Security Act. The Department of Social Services
shall designate individuals, by classification, to have such access.
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund (2,841.43 F.T.E.) ...........................................................$3,336,243,338
Federal Funds (3,778.34 F.T.E.) .........................................................................12,938,058,610
Other Funds (366.72 F.T.E.) ............................................................................... 1,887,725,747
Total (6,986.49 F.T.E.) .....................................................................................$18,162,027,695
